New Jersey, session 222, S81.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Just compensation for an easement over a portion of beachfront property condemned for the purpose of dune construction or beach replenishment shall include consideration of the increase in value to the entire property due to the added safety and property protection provided by the dune or replenished beach.  Any additional rights of the public to access property held in the public trust arising as a result of the easement, or the dune construction or beach replenishment, shall not be considered to cause a diminution in the value of the entire property. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all actions pending on the effective date of the act.